Utah statutes.
63M-9-202.   Steering committee -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  As used in this section, "Council of Mental Health Programs" means a council consisting of all of the directors of Utah public mental health centers.

(2)  There is established a Families, Agencies, and Communities Together Steering Committee.

(3)  The steering committee shall include at least 18 voting members as follows:

(a)  the director of the Division of Health Care Financing within the Department of Health;

(b)  a representative annually designated by the Council of Mental Health Programs;

(c)  the director of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health within the Department of Human Services;

(d)  the director of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services within the Department of Human Services;

(e)  the state director of special education;

(f)  the person responsible for programs for at risk students within the Utah State Office of Education, if that person is not the state director of special education;

(g)  the Juvenile Court Administrator;

(h)  a representative annually designated by substance abuse directors;

(i)  the director of the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services;

(j)  the director of family health services programs;

(k)  a representative annually designated by the Utah School Superintendents Association;

(l)  a juvenile court judge designated by the presiding officer of the state Judicial Council;

(m)  a representative annually designated by the local health officers;

(n)  a representative annually designated by the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services;

(o)  three at-large members appointed by a majority of the committee to four-year terms, who represent a statewide perspective on children and youth issues; and

(p)  parent representatives appointed by members specified in Subsections (3)(a) through (o).

(4)  Additional members may be selected by a majority of the committee to serve as voting members for four-year terms.

(5) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (5)(b), as terms of current at-large committee members expire, the committee shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (5)(a), the committee shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of at-large committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the at-large committee members are appointed every two years.

(6)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(7)  The members shall annually elect a chair and vice chair.

(8)  A majority of committee members are necessary to constitute a quorum and to transact the business of the committee.



(9)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(10)  The committee shall:

(a)  assist the council in fulfilling its duties set out in Section 63M-9-201;

(b)  monitor, solicit input for policy changes, and provide technical assistance to local collaborative programs; and

(c)  report any formal recommendations to the council.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

